Tennessee, session 114, HB1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-709(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "thirty (30) business days" and substituting "thirty (30) calendar days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1146
002799
- 1 -